Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Comunidades Organizando el Poder y la Acción Latina (COPAL), to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new Latino Center for Community Engagement (LCCE). The LCCE must establish working spaces for COPAL and partner organizations and serve as a training center to foster workforce development and employment. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end